District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.04

Public information and involvement program.

(a)

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Disseminate homeland security information to the public and engage residents in homeland security emergency planning;

(2)

Solicit resident input in vulnerability assessment and planning activities; and

(3)

Offer periodic training opportunities to members of the public.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 204
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794